Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4934.02
Laws 1997 changes to act; applicability.

The changes made in sections 77-4901, 77-4909, and 77-4924 by Laws 1997, LB 264, apply to investments made or employment on or after January 1, 1997, and for all agreements in effect on or after January 1, 1997.

Laws 1997, LB 264, § 6.